Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20108-2607
Security freeze; duration; consumer
reporting agency; place hold on file; release; notice; temporarily lift security
freeze; removal of freeze; request from consumer.

(1) A security
freeze shall remain in place, subject to being put on hold or temporarily
lifted as otherwise provided in this section, until the consumer reporting
agency receives a request from the consumer to remove the freeze under section
8-2608.

(2) A consumer reporting agency may place a hold on a file due to a
material misrepresentation of fact by the consumer. When a consumer reporting
agency intends to release a hold on a file, the consumer reporting agency
shall notify the consumer in writing three business days prior to releasing
the hold on the file.

(3) A consumer reporting agency shall temporarily lift a security freeze
only upon request by the consumer under section 8-2606.

(4) A consumer reporting agency shall remove a security freeze upon the date that
the consumer reporting agency receives a request from the consumer to remove
the freeze under section 8-2608.

Laws 2007, LB674, § 7;

Laws 2009, LB177, § 2.